Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2302
Board for examination of contractors; membership; duties.

In any city or village, there may be a board for the examination of air conditioning air distribution contractors for the issuance of certificates of competency and for such other duties and responsibilities as may be prescribed by sections 18-2301 to 18-2315. Such board shall consist of not more than five members all of whom shall be appointed by the mayor, the chairman of the board of trustees, or the city manager with the approval of the city council. All vacancies occurring on the board by reason of death, disability or inability of a member to serve shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. The qualifications for members of the board may be prescribed by the city council or in the case of a village, by the board of trustees.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 2, p. 469.